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DTC P 1125/89*ThrottleControlMotorCircuitMalfunction

*:ETCStroublecodeNo. is2 1.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Throttle motor is operated by the engine ECU and it opens and closes the throttle valve.
The opening angle of the throttle valve is detected by the throttle position sensor which is mounted on the
throttle body and it provides feedback to the engine ECU to control the throttle motor in order to the throttle
valve opening angle properly in response to driving condition.
If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle motor and the magnetic clutch,
and the throttle valve is fully closed by the return spring.
However, the opening angle of the throttle valve can be controlled by the accelerator pedal through the
throttle cable.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Condition (a) and (b) continues for 0.5 seconds:
(a)Throttlecontrolmotoroutputduty 80%
(b) Throttle control motor current < 0.5 A SOpenorshort in throttlecontrolmotorcircuit

P1125/89*
Throttlecontrolmotorcurrent 16A

SThrottlecontrolmotor
S Engine ECU

Under condition continue for 0.6 seconds:
Throttlecontrolmotorcurrent 7 A

SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Checkthrottlecontrolmotorcircuit.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect theoscilloscopebetween terminalsM+orM −

andE1of theengineECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check thewaveformbetween terminalsM+orM − andE1of the
engine ECU when engine is idling.
OK:

The correct waveforms are as shown
HINT:
The waveform frequency varies depending on the throttle
opening.

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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2 Check throttle control motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the throttle control motor and magnetic clutch con-
nector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of the throttle
control motor and magnetic clutch.
OK:

Resistance: 0.3 � 100 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Replace throttle control motor
(See page FI−45).

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between throttle control
motor and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


